Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-524 Delay by filing office.
Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by this part is
excused if:

(1) The delay is caused by interruption of
communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of
equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office; and

(2) The filing office exercises reasonable diligence
under the circumstances.

Note

Section reproduced to correct printing error in main volume.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next